District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.74

Authority to fix certain licensing and registration fees.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and empowered to fix from time to time, in accordance with § 1-301.75, the fees authorized to be charged by §§ 3-1623 [repealed], 3-1711 [repealed], 3-2019 [repealed], 3-2114 [repealed], 3-2115 [repealed], 3-2124 [repealed], 3-2127 [repealed], 3-2128 [repealed], 3-2905 [repealed], 3-2920 [repealed], 3-2301.04 [repealed], 3-2301.06 [repealed], 3-2301.08 [repealed], 3-2414 [repealed], 3-2418 [repealed], 3-2505 [repealed], 3-2609 [repealed], 3-2610 [repealed], 47-2886.13, 3-2704 [repealed], 47-2712, 47-2718 and 47-2843 [repealed].

June 5, 1953, 67 Stat. 43, ch. 101, § 1
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 35(c), 30 DCR 390
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 206(b), 30 DCR 2632
Boxing and wrestling commission, fees for permits and licenses, see § 3-606.
Electrical fees, schedules, see § 47-2712.
Public space permits, fee schedules, see § 47-2718.
This section is referenced in § 1-301.75.
1981 Ed., § 1-346.
1973 Ed., § 1-252.

Section 3-1623 was repealed by D.C. Law 9-184, § 604, 39 DCR 8208, effective March 13, 1992.

Sections 3-1711 and 3-2019 were repealed by D.C. Law 9-245, § 38, 40 DCR 660, effective March 17, 1993.

Sections 3-2114, 3-2128, 3-2905, 3-2920, 3-2301.04, 3-2301.08, 3-2414, 3-2418, 3-2609, 3-2610, were repealed by D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104, effective March 26, 1986.

Section 47-2843 was repealed by D.C. Law 5-84, § 22(a), effective May 22, 1984.

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-1201.